Tennessee, session 114, SB1684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-21-102(3), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (D):
"Disabled driver" also includes a person who is in the second or third trimester of
a pregnancy or who has a pregnancy certified to be high risk by the person's physician;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1684
010212
- 1 -